Utah statutes.
10-2-410.   Boundary commission member terms -- Staggered terms -- Chair --
Quorum -- Vacancy.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), the term of each member of a
boundary commission is four years and begins and expires the first Monday in
January of the applicable year.
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), the terms of the first members of a
commission shall be staggered by lot so that:
(a)  on a seven-member commission, the term of one member is approximately one
year, the term of two members is approximately two years, the term of two
members is approximately three years, and the term of two members is
approximately four years; and
(b)  on a five-member commission, the term of two members is approximately two
years and the term of the other three members is approximately four years.
(3) (a)  The members of each boundary commission shall elect as chair a person
from their number whose term on the boundary commission does not expire for at
least two years.
(b)  The term of a boundary commission chair is two years.
(4)  A majority of the commission constitutes a quorum, and commission action
requires a majority vote of the commission.
(5)  Each vacancy on a commission of a member or an alternate member shall be
filled for the remaining unexpired term of the vacating member by the body
that appointed the vacating member under Section 10-2-409.
